Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20102-959
Control authorities; equipment and
machinery; purchase; use; record.

Control authorities, independently
or in combination, may purchase or provide for needed or necessary equipment
for the control of weeds, whether or not declared noxious, on land under their
jurisdiction and may make available the use of machinery and other equipment
and operators at such cost as may be deemed sufficient to cover the actual
cost of operations, including depreciation, of such machinery and equipment.
All funds so received shall be deposited to the noxious weed control fund or, if no noxious weed control fund exists,
to the county general fund. Each control authority shall keep
a record showing the procurement and rental of equipment, which record shall
be open to inspection by citizens of this state.

Laws 1965, c. 7, § 8, p. 85;

Laws 1975, LB 14, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB731, § 3.
July 15, 2010